District of Columbia statutes.
4-205.11c

Human impact statement.

Within 120 days of October 1, 2013, the Auditor shall conduct an assessment of the impact of reductions in assistance pursuant to this chapter on families and their children and issue a human impact statement, which shall include:

(1)

The number of families affected;

(2)

The number of children affected in the following age categories;

(A)

Infant — 3 years old;

(B)

4-9 years old;

(C)

10-13 years old; and

(D)

14-18 years old;

(3)

A sample of at least 100 families, including a consideration of the children regarding:

(A)

Changes in school performance;

(B)

Changes in after-school performance;

(C)

Changes in health status; and

(D)

New interactions with Child and Family Services Agency, Department of Human Services, Court Social Services, or Department of Youth Rehabilitation Services; and

(4)

The number of service providers providing training programs based on specific performance-based measures, including:

(A)

A description of programs being offered; and

(B)

The enrollment figures in each program.

History

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 511c
as added Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-370, § 522(b), 58 DCR 1008
Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 5142, 60 DCR 12472

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-61 substituted “Within 120 days of October 1, 2013” for “Within 60 days of January 19, 2011” in the introductory language; substituted “100 families” for “35 families” in the introductory language of (3); and substituted “Child and Family Services Agency, Department of Human Services, Court Social Services, or Department of Youth Rehabilitation Services” for “Court Social Services or Department of Youth Rehabilitation Services” in (3)(D).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see §§ 5142 and 5152 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see §§ 5142 and 5152 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).

Short Title

Section 5141 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle M of Title V of the act may be cited as the “Public Assistance Human Impact Amendment Act of 2013”.

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.

Section 5152 of D.C. Law 20-61 repealed section 5163 of the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Time Limit Amendment Act of 2012, effective September 20, 2012 (D.C. Law 19-168; 59 DCR 8025), as of October 1, 2013.